Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB960.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1611(d) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1611. Disqualification.* * *(d) Mitigation of disqualification for life.--(D) MITIGATION OF DISQUALIFICATION FOR LIFE.--[THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING GUIDELINES, INCLUDING CONDITIONS, UNDER WHICH A DISQUALIFICATION FOR LIFE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) MAY BE REDUCED TO A PERIOD OF NOT LESS THAN TEN YEARS, IF SUCH REDUCTIONS ARE PERMITTED BY FEDERAL REGULATIONS.](1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a person subject to lifetime disqualification of commercial driving <--<--123456789101112131415161718 privileges under subsection (c) may apply to the department for reinstatement of commercial driving privileges. The reinstatement shall be subject to the discretion of the department and the following requirements:(i) The person shall voluntarily enter and successfully complete an appropriate rehabilitation program approved by the Department of Health if the lifetime disqualification was a result of a violation of any of the following:(A) S ection 3802 or former section 3731. (B) Section 1547 (relating to chemical testing to determine amount of alcohol or controlled substance) for a refusal to submit to chemical testing.(ii) T he person shall attend and successfully complete an approved driver improvement course administered by a driver improvement school . AUTHORIZED UNDER SECTION 1549 (RELATING TO ESTABLISHMENT OF SCHOOLS), REGARDLESS OF THE UNDERLYING REASON FOR THE LIFETIME DISQUALIFICATION.(iii) T he person shall pay the restoration fee required under section 1617(2) (relating to fees).(iv) T he person shall meet all the requirements under Federal and State law to hold a commercial driver's license.(v) W ithin the ten years preceding the date of an application submitted under this subsection, the person may not have been convicted of any of the following:(A) A violation of section 3802 or former section 3731.20250HB0960PN1460 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) A violation of section 3742.(C) A violation of section 3743.(D) A violation of section 3745. (E) A felony in the commission of which a court determined that a motor vehicle was essentially involved.(F) A violation of section 1606(c).(G) An offense that caused the death of a person as a result of a motor vehicle accident through the negligent operation of a motor vehicle, including a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2504 or a violation of section 3732.(H) (G) A violation of section 1543(b)(1.1) (relating to driving while operating privilege is suspended or revoked).(I) (H) A violation of section 3808(a)(2) (relating to illegally operating a motor vehicle not equipped with ignition interlock).(J) (I) A violation of section 1547 for a refusal to submit to chemical testing. (K) (J) An offense in another state similar to an offense specified in this subparagraph.(vi) The person shall comply with a requirement or condition imposed by a court that is consistent with the treatment needs of the person, the restoration of a victim to preoffense status or the protection of the public.(vii) At least ten years have elapsed from the effective date of the lifetime disqualification of commercial driving privileges under subsection (c).20250HB0960PN1460 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A person who has been convicted of a violation of any of the following shall be ineligible for reinstatement of commercial driving privileges under this subsection:(i) The use of a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony involving the manufacture, distribution or dispensing of a controlled substance or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance.(ii) The use of a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony involving an act or practice of severe forms of trafficking in persons as defined in 22 U.S.C. § 7102(11) (relating to definitions).(iii) Three or more violations of section 3802 or former section 3731 when the person was a commercial driver at the time the violations occurred.(IV) A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3742 WHERE THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS INVOLVED IN AN ACCIDENT RESULTING IN THE DEATH OF A PERSON.(V) AN OFFENSE THAT CAUSED THE DEATH OF A PERSON AS A RESULT OF A MOTOR VEHICLE ACCIDENT THROUGH THE NEGLIGENT OPERATION OF A MOTOR VEHICLE, INCLUDING A VIOLATION OF 18 PA.C.S. § 2504 OR A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3732.(3) A person seeking reinstatement of commercial driving privileges under this subsection shall submit an application, by certified mail OR ELECTRONICALLY AS PERMITTED BY THE DEPARTMENT , on a form prescribed by the department, and shall include proof of all of the following:(i) Voluntary A CERTIFICATE OR OTHER FORM PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR THE VOLUNTARY admittance 20250HB0960PN1460 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and successful completion of an appropriate rehabilitation program approved by the Department of Health if required under paragraph (1)(i).(ii) Attendance A CERTIFICATE OR OTHER FORM PROVIDED BY THE DRIVER IMPROVEMENT SCHOOL FOR THE ATTENDANCE and successful completion of an approved driver improvement course administered by a driver improvement school.(iii) C ompliance with all requirements or conditions imposed by the court.(4) The department shall provide written notice by first class mail of the approval or denial of an application submitted under this subsection within 30 days of receipt of the application. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HAVE UP TO 30 DAYS TO REVIEW AND ISSUE AN APPROVAL OR DENIAL OF AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION. UPON COMPLETION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE BY FIRST CLASS MAIL, OR ELECTRONICALLY AS PERMITTED BY THE DEPARTMENT, OF THE APPROVAL OR DENIAL OF AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION. An applicant who is aggrieved by the decision of the department may appeal in the manner provided in section 1550 (relating to judicial review).(5) If a person approved for reinstatement of commercial driving privileges under this subsection is subsequently convicted of any of the offenses specified in subsection (a) or in 49 CFR 383.51(b) (relating to disqualification of drivers), the person shall be subject to a permanent lifetime disqualification of commercial driving privileges and shall be ineligible for reinstatement under this subsection.(6) The department may [issue regulations establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which a 20250HB0960PN1460 - 5 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disqualification for life under subsection (c) may be reduced to a period of not less than ten years, if such reductions are permitted by Federal regulations] promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement this subsection.(6) IN ORDER TO FACILITATE THE PROMPT IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SUBSECTION:(I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROMULGATE TEMPORARY REGULATIONS THAT SHALL EXPIRE NO LATER THAN THREE YEARS FOLLOWING THE PUBLICATION OF THE TEMPORARY REGULATIONS. THE COMMISSION MAY PROMULGATE TEMPORARY REGULATIONS NOT SUBJECT TO:(A) SECTION 612 OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929.(B) SECTIONS 201, 202, 203, 204 AND 205 OF THE ACT OF JULY 31, 1968 (P.L.769, NO.240), REFERRED TO AS THE COMMONWEALTH DOCUMENTS LAW.(C) SECTIONS 204(B) AND 301(10) OF THE ACT OF OCTOBER 15, 1980 (P.L.950, NO.164), KNOWN AS THE COMMONWEALTH ATTORNEYS ACT.(D) THE ACT OF JUNE 25, 1982 (P.L.633, NO.181), KNOWN AS THE REGULATORY REVIEW ACT.(II) THE DEPARTMENT'S AUTHORITY TO ADOPT TEMPORARY REGULATIONS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) SHALL EXPIRE THREE YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH. REGULATIONS ADOPTED AFTER THIS PERIOD SHALL BE PROMULGATED AS PROVIDED BY LAW.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 18 months.20250HB0960PN1460 - 6 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829